Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 4. Office of Public Defender

§ 5271.
Offices established.

The Defender General may establish public defender offices to carry out his or her responsibilities under this chapter. Each public defender office shall be headed by a public defender selected by the Defender General within the limits of funds and staffing authorized by the General Assembly.

HISTORY:

Added 1971, No. 161 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. date, see note; amended 1973, No. 266 (Adj. Sess.), § 6; 1981, No. 146 (Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 8, 1982.

§ 5272.
Appointment; co-counsel; compensation.

Upon notification under section 5234 of this title or upon request by the person concerned, a public defender shall represent the person with respect to whom the notification is made.
If the public defender assigned to the court’s jurisdiction is unable to represent the person, the court concerned shall assign an attorney to represent the person. Representation may include co-counsel or associate counsel in appropriate cases.
Compensation of the appointed counsel shall be made from funds appropriated to the Office of the Defender General for the compensation of assigned counsel.

HISTORY:

Added 1971, No. 161 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. date, see note; amended 1973, No. 77, § 43; 1981, No. 146 (Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. April 8, 1982.

§ 5273.
Qualifications.

The Deputy Defender General and a public defender must be licensed to practice law in this State and otherwise competent to counsel and defend a person charged with crime.

The Deputy Defender General and a public defender may not otherwise engage in the practice of criminal law, except as otherwise provided in section 5203 of this title. This limitation shall not apply to the assigned counsel coordinator or to attorneys providing services under contract pursuant to section 5253 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added 1971, No 161 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. date, see note; amended 1981, No. 146 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 8, 1982; 1987, No. 183 (Adj. Sess.), § 26.

§ 5274.
Replacement.

At any stage, including appeal or other post-conviction proceedings, the Defender General or the court for good cause may assign a replacement attorney.
The replacement attorney has the same functions with respect to the needy person as the attorney whom he or she replaces.

HISTORY:

Added 1971, No. 161 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. date, see note.

For effective date of this section, see note set out under § 6503 of this title.

§ 5275.
Additional fees forbidden.

A person who represents a needy person under this chapter may not receive any fee for his or her services in addition to that provided under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added 1971, No. 161 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. date, see note.

For effective date of this section, see note set out under § 6503 of this title.

§ 5276.
Reports.

An attorney who is assigned by a court to represent a needy person under section 5272 or 5274 of this title shall report to the Defender General on his or her representation of the needy person, as prescribed by the Defender General.

HISTORY:

Added 1971, No. 161 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. date, see note.

For effective date of this section, see note set out under § 6503 of this title.

§ 5277.
Use of State facilities.

An attorney representing a person under this chapter is entitled to use any State technical services and facilities for the development or evaluation of evidence that are available to the prosecutor.

HISTORY:

Added 1971, No. 161 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. date, see note.

For effective date of this section, see note set out under § 6503 of this title.